Maine, session 132, LD1171.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §10853, sub-§1, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 414, Pt. A, §2
and affected by c. 614, §9, is repealed.
SUMMARY
This bill repeals the law prohibiting complimentary licenses to hunt, trap and fish for
persons 70 years of age and older, which has the effect of restoring the requirement that the
complimentary licenses must be issued upon application.
Page 1 - 132LR0605(01)